West Virginia, session 2026, HB4356.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 5EE.  Performance or assistance of performance of Irreversible gender reassignment surgery. §16-5EE-1. Prohibition of the requiring of the performance or assistance of  performance of an irreversible gender reassignment surgery. (a) As used in this article:(1) "Irreversible gender reassignment surgery" has the same meaning as defined in §30-3-20 of this code; and(2) "Physician" means an individual who is licensed to practice allopathic medicine by the Board of Medicine or licensed to practice osteopathic medicine by the Board of Osteopathic Medicine.(b) Nothing in this code, nor in any order issued pursuant thereto, shall require that a physician perform an irreversible gender reassignment surgery or that any person be required to assist in the performance of an irreversible gender reassignment surgery if such physician or person, for any reason, medical or otherwise, does not wish to perform or assist in such surgery.